Maryland, session 2026, HB0829.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 10–404(g) and (h) of Article – Public Utilities of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be renumbered to be Section(s) 10–404(h) and (i), respectively.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
10–103.
(b) (1) A county or municipal corporation may license taxicab drivers who
drive taxicabs that are based in that county or municipal corporation if, at a minimum, the
county or municipal corporation:
(I) conducts a criminal record check [and] OF EACH APPLICANT
FOR A LICENSE;
(II) CONDUCTS A driving record check of each applicant for a license;
AND
(III) REQUIRES THAT EACH APPLICANT FOR A LICENSE INCLUDE
IN THE APPLICATION DOCUMENTATION VERIFYING THAT THE APPLICANT

HOUSE BILL 829 3
COMPLETED A HUMAN TRAFFICKING AWARENESS TRAINING IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 10–104.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) A taxicab driver licensed by a county or municipal corporation is not
required to be licensed by the Commission.
10–104.
(a) (1) An applicant for a for–hire driver’s license shall:
(i) submit to the Commission a completed application on the form
that the Commission provides;
(ii) state on the form that the applicant is applying for a
passenger–for–hire driver’s license or a taxicab driver’s license;
(iii) pay to the Commission an application fee set by the Commission;
(iv) 1. if the applicant is a Maryland driver, allow the
Commission access to the driver’s photograph through the Motor Vehicle Administration;
or
2. file with the application a recent photograph in a format
that the Commission specifies; [and]
(v) SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSION DOCUMENTATION VERIFYING
THAT THE APPLICANT COMPLETED A HUMAN TRAFFICKING AWARENESS TRAINING
IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 10–104.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
(VI) apply to the Criminal Justice Information System Central
Repository of the Department of Public Safety and Correctional Services for a State
criminal history records check as provided in subsection (b) of this section.
10–104.1.
(b) The Commission may approve an applicant and issue a temporary driver’s
license to the applicant if:
(1) the applicant provides all information that the Commission requires for
the application, including the information specified in item (2) of this subsection; [and]
(2) the Commission is satisfied with the successful submission of the
applicant’s:
(i) national criminal history records check:

HOUSE BILL 829
1. conducted by a consumer reporting agency as defined
under § 14–1201 of the Commercial Law Article or a comparable entity approved by the
Commission; and
2. that includes:
A. a Multi–State Multi–Jurisdiction Criminal Records
Database Search or a search of a similar nationwide database with validation;
B. a search of the Sex Offender Registry; and
C. a search of the U.S. Department of Justice’s National Sex
Offender Public website; and
(ii) driving record check that includes a driving history research
report; AND
(3) THE APPLICANT SUBMITS TO THE COMMISSION DOCUMENTATION
VERIFYING THAT THE APPLICANT COMPLETED A HUMAN TRAFFICKING AWARENESS
TRAINING IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 10–104.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
10–104.2.
(A) AN APPLICANT FOR A LICENSE ISSUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
10–103(B) OF THIS SUBTITLE OR UNDER § 10–104, § 10–104.1, OR § 10–106 OF THIS
SUBTITLE OR § 10–404 OF THIS TITLE SHALL INCLUDE IN THE APPLICATION
DOCUMENTATION VERIFYING THAT THE APPLICANT COMPLETED:
(1) (I) THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION’S LEADERS
AGAINST HUMAN TRAFFICKING/COMBATTING HUMAN TRAFFICKING IN THE
TRANSPORTATION AWARENESS TRAINING; OR
(II) (2) ANY NATIONALLY RECOGNIZED HUMAN TRAFFICKING
AWARENESS TRAINING PROGRAM; AND.
(2) (B) A A HUMAN TRAFFICKING PREVENTION PROGRAM THAT
PROVIDES AWARENESS TRAINING THAT AN APPLICANT COMPLETES UNDER
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION MUST INCLUDE INFORMATION ON HOW TO:
(I) (1) RECOGNIZE POTENTIAL VICTIMS OF HUMAN
TRAFFICKING;
(II) (2) RESPOND TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO MAY BE OR IS A
VICTIM OF HUMAN TRAFFICKING; AND

HOUSE BILL 829 5
(III) (3) CONNECT AN INDIVIDUAL WHO MAY BE OR IS A VICTIM
OF HUMAN TRAFFICKING WITH AVAILABLE RESOURCES REPORT SUSPECTED
INCIDENTS OF HUMAN TRAFFICKING TO APPROPRIATE AUTHORITIES.
(B) (C) A LICENSED TAXICAB DRIVER, OR FOR–HIRE DRIVER, OR
TRANSPORTATION NETWORK OPERATOR MAY NOT BE HELD CIVILLY OR CRIMINALLY
LIABLE FOR REPORTING OR RESPONDING IN GOOD FAITH TO A SUSPECTED
INCIDENT OF HUMAN TRAFFICKING.
10–106.
(a) The term of a for–hire driver’s license is not less than 1 year and not more
than 3 years, as the Commission sets.
(b) (1) An applicant for a renewal of a for–hire driver’s license shall:
(I) submit to the Commission an application on the form that the
Commission provides; AND
(II) INCLUDE IN THE APPLICATION DOCUMENTATION
VERIFYING THAT THE APPLICANT COMPLETED A HUMAN TRAFFICKING AWARENESS
TRAINING IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 10–104.2 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(2) The Commission may renew the for–hire driver’s license by appropriate
endorsement on the license.
(c) The Commission shall keep on file with the original application of a driver a
complete record of:
(1) each for–hire driver’s license issued to the driver; and
(2) any renewal, suspension, and revocation of a for–hire driver’s license
issued to the driver.
10–404.
(b) The Commission may approve an applicant to be an operator and issue a
temporary transportation network operator’s license to the applicant if:
(1) the applicant provides all information that the Commission requires for
the application, including the information specified in item (2) of this subsection; [and]
(2) the Commission is satisfied with the successful submission of the
applicant’s:

HOUSE BILL 829
(i) national criminal history records check:
1. conducted by a consumer reporting agency as defined
under § 14–1201 of the Commercial Law Article or a comparable entity approved by the
Commission; and
2. that includes:
A. a Multi–State Multi–Jurisdiction Criminal Records
Database Search or a search of a similar nationwide database with validation;
B. a search of the Sex Offender Registry; and
C. a search of the U.S. Department of Justice’s National Sex
Offender Public Website; and
(ii) driving record check that includes a driving history research
report; AND
(3) THE APPLICANT SUBMITS TO THE COMMISSION DOCUMENTATION
VERIFYING THAT THE APPLICANT COMPLETED A HUMAN TRAFFICKING AWARENESS
TRAINING IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 10–104.2 OF THIS TITLE.
(c) Subject to subsection (d) of this section, the Commission may issue a
permanent transportation network operator’s license to an applicant [upon] ON the
submission of:
(1) a satisfactory supplemental criminal background check as set forth
under § 10–104(b) of this title; AND
(2) DOCUMENTATION VERIFYING THAT THE APPLICANT COMPLETED
A HUMAN TRAFFICKING AWARENESS TRAINING IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 10–104.2 OF
THIS TITLE.
(G) AN APPLICANT FOR THE RENEWAL OF A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
OPERATOR’S LICENSE SHALL SUBMIT TO THE COMMISSION DOCUMENTATION
VERIFYING THAT THE APPLICANT COMPLETED A HUMAN TRAFFICKING AWARENESS
TRAINING IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 10–104.2 OF THIS TITLE.
(G) (1) THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT APPLY TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(I) SUBMITTED AN APPLICATION FOR A TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK OPERATOR’S LICENSE ON OR BEFORE SEPTEMBER 30, 2026; AND

HOUSE BILL 829 7
(II) COMPLETED, BETWEEN JULY JUNE 1, 2025, AND
SEPTEMBER NOVEMBER 30, 2026, A HUMAN TRAFFICKING AWARENESS TRAINING
THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF PARAGRAPHS (2) AND (3) OF THIS
SUBSECTION.
(2) A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK COMPANY MAY NOT ALLOW AN
APPLICANT FOR A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK OPERATOR’S LICENSE OR THE
HOLDER OF A TEMPORARY OR PERMANENT TRANSPORTATION NETWORK
OPERATOR’S LICENSE TO PROVIDE TRANSPORTATION NETWORK SERVICES USING A
DIGITAL NETWORK APPLICATION UNLESS THE APPLICANT OR LICENSE HOLDER,
WITHIN 30 DAYS AFTER THE APPLICANT OR LICENSE HOLDER FIRST PROVIDES A
PREARRANGED RIDE, HAS COMPLETED:
(I) THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION’S LEADERS
AGAINST HUMAN TRAFFICKING/COMBATTING TRAFFICKING/COMBATING HUMAN
TRAFFICKING IN THE TRANSPORTATION SECTOR AWARENESS TRAINING;
(II) ANY NATIONALLY RECOGNIZED HUMAN TRAFFICKING
AWARENESS TRAINING PROGRAM; OR
(III) ANY DIGITAL TRAINING DEVELOPED BY A TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK COMPANY IN CONSULTATION WITH A NATIONALLY RECOGNIZED
ORGANIZATION WITH EXPERTISE IN HUMAN TRAFFICKING AWARENESS TRAINING.
(3) A HUMAN TRAFFICKING AWARENESS TRAINING THAT AN
APPLICANT OR LICENSE HOLDER COMPLETES UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION MUST INCLUDE INFORMATION ON HOW TO:
(I) RECOGNIZE POTENTIAL VICTIMS OF HUMAN TRAFFICKING;
(II) RESPOND TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO MAY BE OR IS A VICTIM OF
HUMAN TRAFFICKING; AND
(III) CONNECT AN INDIVIDUAL WHO MAY BE OR IS A VICTIM
REPORT SUSPECTED INCIDENTS OF HUMAN TRAFFICKING WITH AVAILABLE
RESOURCES TO APPROPRIATE AUTHORITIES.
(4) AN APPLICANT FOR A TRANSPORTATION NETWORK OPERATOR’S
LICENSE OR THE HOLDER OF A TEMPORARY OR PERMANENT TRANSPORTATION
NETWORK OPERATOR’S LICENSE MAY NOT BE HELD CIVILLY OR CRIMINALLY LIABLE
FOR REPORTING OR RESPONDING IN GOOD FAITH TO A SUSPECTED INCIDENT OF
HUMAN TRAFFICKING.

HOUSE BILL 829
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.